California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
 tanker company operations, and one of whom shall be engaged in dry cargo operations. The board of directors of a regional maritime trade association controlled by West Coast vessel operators that specifically represents the owners and operators of vessels or barges engaged in transportation by water of cargo or passengers from or to the Pacific area of the United States shall nominate, rank, and submit to the Governor the names of three persons for each category of industry member to be appointed.

(3) Three members shall be public members. Any person may serve as a public member unless otherwise prohibited by law, except that during his or her term of office or within the two years preceding his or her appointment, a public member appointed shall not have (A) any financial or proprietary interest in the ownership, operation, or
 management of tugs, cargo, or passenger vessels, (B) sailed under the authority of a federal or state pilot license in waters under the jurisdiction of the board, (C) been employed by a company that is a substantial user of pilot services, or (D) been a consultant or other person providing professional services who had received more than 20 percent in the aggregate of his or her income from a company that is a substantial user of pilot services or an association of companies that are substantial users of pilot services. Ownership of less than one-tenth of 1 percent of the stock of a publicly traded corporation is not a financial or proprietary interest in the ownership of tugs, cargo, or passenger vessels.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter does not prohibit the Governor from notifying the nominating authority identified in
 paragraph (2) that persons nominated are unacceptable for appointment. Following that notification, the nominating authority shall submit a new list of nominees to the Governor, naming three persons, none of whom were previously nominated, from which the Governor may make the appointment. This process shall be continued until a person nominated by the nominating authority and satisfactory to the Governor has been appointed.

(b) Members appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be appointed with staggered terms as follows:

(1) Each of the members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall be appointed for a four-year term, except that the first member appointed after December 31, 2012, to an initial term pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a)
 shall be appointed to a term expiring on December 31, 2014, and the first member appointed after December 31, 2012, to an initial term pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be appointed to a term expiring on December 31, 2014.

(2) Members appointed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be appointed with staggered four-year terms with the initial four-year terms expiring on December 31 of the years 1988, 1990, and 1991, respectively.

(3) A person shall not be appointed for more than two terms.

(4) Vacancies on the board for both expired and unexpired terms shall be filled by the appointing power in the manner prescribed by subdivision (a).

(c) A quorum of the board members consists of four members. All actions of the board shall require the vote of four members, a quorum being present.

(d) The Secretary of Transportation shall serve as an ex officio member of the board who, without vote, may exercise all other privileges of a member of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 330.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.

Each member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of California. Each member appointed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1150 shall be a resident of one of the following counties: San Francisco, Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Mendocino, Monterey, Sacramento, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Solano, San Joaquin, Napa, Sonoma, or Yolo. The member shall hold office during the pleasure of the power appointing the member, not to exceed four years from the date of the member’s commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 660, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1152.

(a) The public members of the board shall receive, as compensation for their services, the amount that the board may, from time to time, determine, which shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600) each per month.

(b) The appointed members and employees of the board shall also be allowed necessary traveling and other verified expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1153.

(a) The board shall organize itself by electing a president, and shall provide offices in San Francisco or Alameda County, in which it shall meet once a month, and it may adjourn its regular meetings from time to time.

 (b) Meetings of the board are subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.

(a) The board is vested with all functions and duties relating to the administration of this division, except those functions and duties vested in the Secretary of Business, Transportation and Housing.

(b) The board’s vested powers include the power to make and enforce rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to carry out its provisions and to govern its actions. These rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.

The president of the board may administer oaths in regard to any matter properly before it and he or she may issue subpoenas for witnesses in like cases. A witness disobeying the subpoena served on him or her shall incur a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500), for which judgment may be recovered by the board in a civil action. This section shall not apply to proceedings conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.

(a) The board may appoint, fix the compensation of, and from time to time adjust the compensation of, an executive director who is exempt from the civil service laws, and other employees as may be necessary. The executive director may perform all duties, exercise all powers, discharge all responsibilities, and administer and enforce all laws, rules, and regulations under the jurisdiction of the board, with the approval of the board, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The administration of personnel employed by the board in accordance with the civil service laws.

(2) To serve as treasurer of the board and keep, maintain, and provide the
 board with all statements of accounts, records of receipts, and disbursements of the board in accordance with the law.

(3) The issuance and countersigning of licenses that shall also be signed by the president of the board.

(4) The administration of matters and the maintenance of files pertaining to action taken against licenses issued by the board.

(5) The administration of investigations of, and reporting on, a navigational incident or other matter for which a license issued by the board may be revoked or suspended.

(6) To work with board members, staff, and other interested stakeholders to recommend improvements in the pilot training program.

(7) Under the direction of the board, to
 coordinate with other state and federal agencies charged with protecting the environment and with the oil and hazardous chemical shipping industry.

(8) Any other function, task, or duty as may reasonably be assigned by the president of the board, including, but not limited to, performing research and obtaining documents and other evidence for board activities, including rate hearings.

(b) The Secretary of Business, Transportation and Housing shall appoint one assistant director to serve in a career executive assignment at the pleasure of the secretary. The assistant director shall have the duties as assigned by the executive director, and shall be responsible to
 the executive director for the performance of his or her duties.

(c) The board may employ personnel necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All personnel shall be appointed pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except for the executive director and the assistant director, who shall be exempt from state civil service. The board may fix the compensation of, and from time to time adjust the compensation of, any employees as may be necessary.

(d) All personnel of the board shall be appointed, directed, and controlled by the board, the executive director, or the board’s authorized deputies or agents to whom it may delegate its powers.

(e) The board may contract and employ commission investigators. The board shall adopt
 regulations for the minimum standards for a commission investigator that shall include, but are not limited to, a basic knowledge of investigative techniques and maritime issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 7.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.5.

(a) The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board and shall be under the direct supervision of the board. The term of office to which the executive director is appointed is five years.

(b) The Secretary of Business, Transportation and Housing, or his or her designee, shall act as the executive director during the absence from the state or other temporary absence, disability, or unavailability of the executive director, or during a vacancy in that position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 11.5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.6.

(a) If suspected safety standard violations concerning pilot hoists, pilot ladders, or the proper rigging of pilot hoists or pilot ladders are reported to the board, the executive director shall investigate the report. The executive director may personally inspect or assign a commission investigator to personally inspect the equipment for its compliance with the relevant safety standards promulgated by the United States Coast Guard and the International Maritime Organization. If, in the preliminary investigation, the equipment is found to be in violation, or in likely violation in the opinion of the executive director, of the relevant safety standards, the executive director shall immediately alert the appropriate United States Coast Guard office. The executive director shall report his or her findings and recommendations, if
 any, to the board. The board shall receive the executive director’s findings, which may include other reports, information, or statements from interested parties. The board shall specify, by regulation, the information that shall be contained in the report.

(b) This section applies to the pilotage grounds, as defined in Section 1114.5. If a vessel passes outside of the pilotage grounds, the executive director’s report shall include that fact along with a description of the incident.

(c) The record of the investigation and the board’s findings and recommendations, if any, shall be a public record maintained by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 80.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.7.

If the executive director of the board alerts the United States Coast Guard to a violation or likely violation of safety standards pursuant to Section 1156.6 and has reason to believe that the violation or likely violation will not be corrected prior to the vessel reaching its next port of call, the executive director shall request the United States Coast Guard to report the suspected safety standard violation to the port state control officer or a pilot organization in an expected future port of call. This section does not preclude any other party from disseminating any report of the findings and recommendations of the executive director of the board pursuant to Section 1156.6, and all of those reports and findings shall be considered public
 records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 4.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.

The board shall keep a written record of all the board’s proceedings and acts.

(a) The board shall also keep a complete record of each pilot appointed and licensed by the board that includes, at a minimum, his or her current mailing address, residence, the date of the initial issuance and renewal of the license, the date of completion for initial and any subsequent training, and a record of any reports of meritorious activities, commendation, misconduct, safety violations, or other incidents or information related or relevant to the issuance and use of his or her pilot license.

(b) All pilots licensed by the board shall provide the board with written notice of any change of name, mailing address, or residence within 30 days of that change in a manner prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 9.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.1.

(a) Except as provided in Section 1157.4, all records of the board relating to the personal information of a pilot, a pilot trainee, or an applicant to the pilot trainee training program are confidential and shall not be open to public inspection.

(b) For purposes of this section, “personal information” means information, other than the name and mailing address, that identifies an individual, including an individual’s photograph, social security number, address, telephone number, and medical or disability information, but does not include other information related to licensing such as incidents, rules or safety violations, misconduct, training records, commendations, and license
 status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 10.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.2.

The board shall establish procedures for access to confidential or restricted information from its records to protect the confidentiality of its employees and licensees. If confidential or restricted information is released to an agent of a person authorized to obtain information, the person shall require the agent to take all steps necessary to ensure confidentiality and prevent the release of information to a third party. An agent shall not obtain or use confidential or restricted records for any purpose other than the reason the information was requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.3.

A member of the board, the executive director, the assistant director, or an employee of the board who willfully discloses confidential information from the board record to a person not authorized to receive it shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.4.

Upon a request to the board by a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency, the executive director shall make available to the requesting agency any information contained in the board’s records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.5.

On or before April 15, 2010, and annually thereafter, the board shall submit to the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Secretary of Business, Transportation and Housing a report describing the board’s activities for the preceding calendar year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The number of vessel movements across the bar, on the bays, and on the rivers within the board’s jurisdiction.

(b) The name of each licensed pilot and pilot trainee, and the status of each person. If a person has
 had more than one status during the reporting year, each status and the length of time in that status shall be indicated. For the purposes of this section, “status” includes all of the following designations:

(1) Licensed and fit for duty.

(2) Licensed and not fit for duty.

(3) Licensed and on authorized training.

(4) Licensed and on active military duty.

(5) Licensed and on leave of absence.

(6) Licensed but license suspended.

(c) A summary of each report of misconduct or a navigational incident involving a pilot
 or pilot trainee, or other matters for which a license issued by the board may be revoked or suspended. For those cases that have been closed, the summary shall include a description of findings made by the incident review committee and of the resulting action taken by the board. For those cases that are still under investigation, the summary shall include a description of the reported incident and an estimated completion date for the investigation. For those closed cases involving a pilot who has been involved in a prior incident and a finding of pilot error had been made, the report shall also include a summary of that incident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 11.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.6.

(a) After the adoption of the first pilotage tariff pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1250), the board shall convene a committee to review the effectiveness of the revised ratesetting process and to gather stakeholder feedback for the purpose of developing a report for the board’s consideration. Upon adoption of the report by the board based on the findings of the committee, the board shall present and submit the report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Governor, and to the Secretary of Transportation. The report shall be adopted by the board no later than December 31, 2027.

(b) Pursuant to Section
 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2032.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 2.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1158.

The public members, the executive director, the assistant director, and employees of the board shall not engage in an employment, activity, or enterprise that is clearly inconsistent, incompatible, in conflict with, or inimical to his or her duties as a state officer or employee or make, participate in making, or attempt to use his or her official position to in any way influence a governmental decision in which he or she knows or has reason to know that he or she, or any member of his or her immediate family, has a financial interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1158.1.

The executive director shall not, during the term of his or her office, serve as a member of the board or as a pilot, or otherwise be concurrently employed in the maritime industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 12.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1159.

(a) All moneys received by the board pursuant to the provisions of any law shall be accounted for at the close of each month to the Controller in the form that the Controller may prescribe and, at the same time on the order of the Controller, all these moneys shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund are appropriated without regard to fiscal years for the payment of the compensation and expenses of the board and its officers and employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1159.1.

(a) The Pilot Boat Surcharge Account is hereby established in the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the account are hereby continuously appropriated to the board without regard to fiscal years for allocation by the board for both of the following:

(1) To fund the pilot boat costs of obtaining new pilot boats and of funding design and engineering modifications for the purpose of extending the service life of existing pilot boats, excluding costs for repair or maintenance, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1194.

(2) (A) To cover the administrative costs of the board with respect to administration of the account, including any audits of the usage of the account.

(B) No more than 5 percent of all moneys collected may be used by the board to offset administrative costs and expenses related to managing the pilot boat program, including auditing expenses.

(b) Interest earned on the moneys in the Pilot Boat Surcharge Account shall be allocated to the Pilot Boat Surcharge Account and shall be expended to recover the pilots’ claims submitted pursuant to Section 1194.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 856, Sec. 1.   (SB 295)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1159.2.

(a) The vessel shall pay a board operations surcharge, the purpose of which is to fully compensate the board and the Transportation Agency for the official services, staff services, and incidental expenses of the board and agency. The amount of the surcharge shall be 7.5 percent of all pilotage fees charged by pilots pursuant to Sections 1190 and 1191 unless the board establishes, with the approval of the Department of Finance, a lesser percentage, not to exceed any percentage consistent with subdivision (d).

(b) The surcharge shall be billed and collected by the pilots. The pilots shall pay all surcharges collected by them to the board monthly or at a later time that the board may direct.

(c) The board shall quarterly review its ongoing and anticipated expenses and adjust the surcharge to reflect any changes that have occurred since the last adjustment.

(d) The board operations surcharge shall not represent a percentage significantly more than that required to support the board and any costs of the Transportation Agency related to the administration of the board pursuant to subdivision (a) in addition to the maintenance of a reasonable reserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 243.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Pension Plan [1160. - 1168.]

1160.

There is hereby established a San Francisco Bar Pilot Pension Plan which is continued in existence as the San Francisco Pilot Pension Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1653, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

1161.

All amounts generated by the pension plan shall be used solely to pay pensions to retired pilots and inland pilots, disabled pilots and inland pilots, the surviving spouses of pilots and inland pilots, and to pay the expenses of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1192, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1162.

(a) The pension plan shall be administered and all benefit payments shall be made by one or more fiduciary agents selected by the board. Except for the collection of revenues in accordance with Section 1165 and the pilots serving as members of the board, and unless otherwise directed by the board, the pilots shall have no control of any kind or manner over the operation, administration, or management of the plan.

(b) All revenues pursuant to the plan shall be collected by the pilots, at no cost to the state or board, and transmitted monthly to the fiduciary agent or agents. The revenues shall not be included in the account required by Section 1136.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1163.

(a) (1) (A) Each retired pilot and inland pilot, who has completed 25 full years of service as a pilot or inland pilot, or both, shall receive, as a target monthly pension, an amount that is initially equal to 46 percent of an amount that is an average of the highest three of the last five years of audited annual average net income per pilot, prior to the pilot’s or inland pilot’s retirement, divided by 12, which initial target monthly pension amount shall be subject to periodic adjustment pursuant to Section 1167. Pilots or inland pilots with other than 25 full years of service as a pilot or inland pilot, or both, shall receive a monthly pension in an amount that is determined by multiplying the above calculated target monthly pension by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full years of service that the pilot or inland pilot has rendered and the denominator of which shall be 25 years, which initial monthly pension amount shall be subject to periodic adjustment pursuant to Section 1167.

(B) Each disabled pilot or inland pilot shall receive as an initial target monthly pension an amount that is based on 46 percent of the greater of the following, which amount shall be subject to periodic adjustment pursuant to Section 1167:

(i) An amount that is the average of the highest three of the last five years of audited annual average net income per pilot divided by 12 and multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full years of service that the pilot or inland pilot has rendered and the denominator of which shall be 25 years.

(ii) The audited annual average net income per pilot, for the last year prior to the pilot’s or inland pilot’s disability, divided by 12 and multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full years of service that the pilot or inland pilot has rendered and the denominator of which shall be 25 years.

(C) Each pilot who retired before January 1, 1985, shall receive as an initial target monthly pension an amount that is one hundred seventy-eight dollars ($178) multiplied by the number of full years of service he or she performed as a pilot licensed under this division, which amount shall be subject to periodic adjustment pursuant to Section 1167.

(D) Each pilot who retired on or after January 1, 1985, or each inland pilot who retired after January 1, 1993, shall receive as an initial target monthly pension an amount that is the greater of the following, which amount shall be subject to periodic adjustment pursuant to Section 1167:

(i) An amount that is calculated by multiplying one hundred seventy-eight dollars ($178) by the number of full years of service the pilot or inland pilot performed as a pilot or inland pilot licensed under this division.

(ii) An amount that is 46 percent of the average of the highest three of the last five years of audited annual average net income per pilot, prior to the pilot’s or inland pilot’s retirement, divided by 12 and multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the pilot’s or inland pilot’s actual number of full years of service and the denominator of which is 25 years.

(2) A pilot or inland pilot who retires or becomes disabled shall not begin to receive a pension until the beginning of the benefit payment period next following the date on which the pilot or inland pilot retires or becomes disabled.

(3) A pilot or inland pilot shall not receive any benefits pursuant to the pension plan in any benefit payment period unless the pilot’s or inland pilot’s resignation as an active pilot or inland pilot specifying a proposed date of retirement was submitted, in writing, to the board, prior to November if the pilot’s or inland pilot’s retirement is to be effective the first day of the following January, prior to February if the pilot’s or inland pilot’s retirement is to be effective the first day of the following April, prior to May if the pilot’s or inland pilot’s retirement is to be effective the first day of the following July, or prior to August if the pilot’s or inland pilot’s retirement is to be effective the first day of the following October. The pilot’s or inland pilot’s resignation as an active pilot or inland pilot shall become effective on either January 1, April 1, July 1, or October 1, as specified in the written resignation.

(4) If a retired or disabled pilot or inland pilot who is receiving a pension dies without a surviving spouse, the pilot’s or inland pilot’s successor in interest shall receive the monthly pension for the remainder of the benefit payment period within which the death occurs, after which time the monthly pension shall cease.

(b) (1) The surviving spouse of a deceased pilot who is eligible for a pension pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1164 and the surviving spouse of a deceased inland pilot who is eligible for a pension pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1164 shall each receive, as a monthly pension, three-fourths of the amount that the deceased pilot or inland pilot would have received as a monthly pension pursuant to this section had the pilot or inland pilot lived, calculated as if the deceased pilot or inland pilot had been disabled pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) If a retired or disabled pilot or inland pilot who was receiving a pension dies, the surviving spouse shall continue to receive the full amount of the monthly pension to which the deceased pilot or inland pilot was entitled for the balance of the benefit payment period within which the death occurs, after which the surviving spouse shall receive the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(3) If a surviving spouse receiving a pension dies, the surviving spouse’s successor in interest shall receive the monthly pension for the remainder of the benefit payment period within which the death occurs, after which time the monthly pension shall cease.

(c) For the purpose of the computations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), six months or more of service by a pilot or inland pilot shall be considered a full year.

(d) Except as provided otherwise in this section and paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) of Section 1164, monthly pension amounts payable pursuant to this section to retired pilots and inland pilots and to their surviving spouses are payable for the life of that retired pilot, inland pilot, or spouse.

(e) To determine an inland pilot’s full years of service under this chapter, any periods of service that an inland pilot has performed as a pilot shall be added to any service time performed as an inland pilot after January 1, 1987.

(f) In calculating the benefits of a retired or disabled pilot who was issued an original pilot’s license in 1985 and who was not thereafter issued an inland pilot’s license, or in calculating the benefits of the widow of such a pilot who is deceased, the number of years of service used in the calculation shall be the greater of the following:

(1) The actual number of full years of service the pilot has rendered.

(2) Ten years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a pilot shall be eligible for the pension provided in Section 1163 if the pilot meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Held a license as a pilot and served at least 10 years in that capacity or has attained 62 years of age, whichever occurs first.

(2) Retired after January 1, 1972. 

(3) Is at least 60 years of age. 

(b) A disabled pilot shall be eligible for the pension provided in Section 1163 if it has been determined by the board, based upon competent medical evidence, that the pilot is unable to perform the duties of a pilot. As used in this chapter, “disabled” means a disability of permanent or extended and uncertain duration, as determined by the board, on the basis of competent medical opinion.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), an inland pilot shall be eligible for the pension provided in Section 1163 if the inland pilot meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Held a license as an inland pilot and served at least 10 years in that capacity after January 1, 1987, or has attained 62 years of age, whichever occurs first.

(2) Retired after January 1, 1987.

(3) Is at least 60 years of age.

(4) Since January 1, 1987, has held himself or herself out as providing pilotage assistance to the entire shipping industry consistent with the inland pilot’s license.

(5) For services provided after January 1, 1994, performs a minimum of 75 assignments per calendar year unless excused from performance of that requirement due to medical needs satisfactory to the board.

(d) A disabled inland pilot who meets the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) shall be eligible for the pension provided in Section 1163 if it has been determined by the board, based upon competent medical evidence, that the inland pilot is unable to perform the duties of an inland pilot.

(e) (1) A surviving spouse of a deceased pilot shall be eligible for the pension provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1163 if that deceased pilot died after January 1, 1972, and that deceased pilot had held a license as a pilot.

(2) A surviving spouse of a deceased inland pilot shall be eligible for the pension provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1163 if the deceased inland pilot died after January 1, 1987, had held a license as an inland pilot, and since January 1, 1987, had held himself or herself out as providing pilotage assistance to the entire shipping industry consistent with the inland pilot’s license.

(3) In order for a surviving spouse to be eligible for any pension benefits pursuant to this chapter, the surviving spouse shall have been legally married to the deceased pilot or inland pilot for at least one year prior to the deceased pilot’s or inland pilot’s death.

(4) A surviving spouse of a deceased pilot or inland pilot shall neither be eligible for, nor receive, pension benefits pursuant to this chapter if the surviving spouse remarries. If a surviving spouse who is receiving a monthly pension under this chapter remarries, the surviving spouse’s successor in interest shall receive the amount of the monthly pension for the remainder of the benefit payment period as if the surviving spouse had died, in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1165.

(a) In addition to, and concurrently with, the basic pilotage rate described in Section 1190, a charge shall be levied for pilotage services at a rate necessary to provide the benefits to be paid out pursuant to the pension plan. The additional rate shall be determined as follows:

(1) On March 1, June 1, September 1, and December 1 of each year, the number of persons eligible to receive benefits under the plan, their identities, the calculated amount each shall be entitled to receive, and the total amount to be paid out to all of those persons during each month of the next three-month period shall be determined by the fiduciary agent or agents.

(2) After the total amount to be paid out monthly under the plan has been determined, the rate necessary to provide that amount each month shall be calculated by the fiduciary agent or agents. The rate shall be based upon the volume of shipping, in gross registered tons, handled by pilots licensed under this division for the 12-month periods ending the previous September 30 for benefit periods commencing the following January 1, ending the previous December 31 for benefit periods commencing the following April 1, ending the previous March 31 for benefit periods commencing the following July 1, and ending the previous June 30 for benefit periods commencing the following October 1, respectively. The rate shall be expressed as mills per gross registered ton and shall be calculated to the nearest one-hundredth of a mill.

(3) The estimated cost of the services of the fiduciary agent or agents to administer the pension plan shall be calculated by the fiduciary agent or agents for the benefit periods described in paragraph (2), shall be expressed as mills per gross registered ton, and shall be calculated to the nearest one-hundredth of a mill.

(b) The rate determined pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) shall become effective on January 1 of the following year with respect to the September 30 calculations, on April 1 of the following year with respect to the December 31 calculations, on July 1 of that year with respect to the March 31 calculations, and on October 1 of that year with respect to the June 30 calculations. The rates shall be in effect for the succeeding benefit payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 639, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1166.

(a) The benefits actually paid out each month by the fiduciary agent or agents designated by the board to all retired and disabled pilots and inland pilots, to surviving spouses of deceased pilots and inland pilots, and to successors in interest shall be equal to the revenue received pursuant to Section 1165 during the preceding month less the expenses of the fiduciary agent or agents incurred during that month. The revenue, whether greater or less than the amount used in determining the tonnage rates under this chapter to provide the aggregate target pensions to which those persons are entitled according to Section 1163, shall be paid to each of them in proportion to the relative target amounts to which they are entitled, after payment of the expenses of the fiduciary agent or agents.

(b) Revenues for any month or year are the amounts to be received pursuant to the pension plan for pilotage during that month or year. The fiduciary agent or agents shall determine which accounting system shall be used to make the payment, provided that, if the accrual method is used, it shall be subject to later equitable adjustments for unpaid receivables.

(c) Benefits pursuant to the new rate calculations shall be paid commencing in February, May, August, and November of each year and shall continue through, and include, the next following April, July, October, and January, respectively, so that each benefit pension period equals three months of payments. The period during which benefits are paid is the benefit payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1192, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1167.
